Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 9 Public Works
22-9-701. Relocation assistance and payments.

When any department, agency, or instrumentality of the state, or any county, municipality, or other political subdivision, or any levee, drainage, or other improvement district, or any other public entity subject to the provisions of the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970 undertakes any program or project wholly or partially financed with federal funds which involves the acquisition, condemnation, or demolition of real property or other action which results in any persons being displaced from their homes or businesses, the state department, agency, or instrumentality, or county, municipality, or other political subdivision, or levee, drainage, or other improvement district, or other public entity is authorized to provide relocation assistance and to make relocation payments to the displaced persons and to do such other acts and follow such procedures and practices as may be necessary to comply with the provisions of the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 12, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-1001.

U.S. Code.

The Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, referred to in this section, is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 4601 et seq.

22-9-702. Payments not compensation for realty taken.

Any payment made under the authority granted in §22-9-701 shall be for compensating or reimbursing the displaced person in accordance with the requirements of the Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, and the payments shall not, for any purpose, be deemed or considered compensation for real property acquired or as compensation for damages to remaining real property.

History.

Acts 1973, No. 12, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 14-1002.

U.S. Code.

The Uniform Relocation Assistance and Real Property Acquisition Policies Act of 1970, referred to in this section, is codified as 42 U.S.C. § 4601 et seq.

Subchapter 8

— Fair and Open Competition in Governmental Construction Act

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 2015, No. 600 was enacted without act section numbering.

22-9-801. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Fair and Open Competition in Governmental Construction Act”.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 600, § [1].

22-9-802. Legislative intent.

The General Assembly intends that this subchapter:

(1)

Provide for the efficient procurement of goods and services by governmental units;

(2)

Promote the economical, nondiscriminatory, and efficient administration and completion of state and state-funded or state-assisted construction projects;

(3)

Provide for fair and open competition for construction contracts, grants, tax abatements, and tax credits awarded by governmental units;

(4)

Prohibit requirements for certain terms in construction contracts awarded by governmental units or supported through grants and tax subsidies and abatements by governmental units;

(5)

Prohibit expenditure of public funds under certain conditions;

(6)

Prohibit certain terms in procurement documents for certain expenditures by governmental units involving public facilities; and

(7)

Provide powers and duties for certain public officers, employees, and contractors.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 600, § [1].

22-9-803. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Public agency” means:

(A)

An agency of the State of Arkansas;

(B)

An agency of a county, city, town, school district, or other political subdivision of the state;

(C)

A public trust;

(D)

A public entity specifically created by a statute of this state; and

(E)

A department, agency, board, bureau, commission, committee, or authority of a public entity listed in subdivisions (1)(A)-(D) of this section; and

(2)(A)

“Public improvement” means a beneficial or valuable change or addition, betterment, enhancement, or amelioration of or upon real property or upon an interest in real property belonging to a public agency intended to enhance its value, beauty, or utility or to adapt it to new or further purposes.

(B)

“Public improvement” does not include the direct purchase of materials, equipment, or supplies or personal property by a public agency.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 600, § [1].

22-9-804. Public agency construction contracts — Prohibited terms.

A public agency that awards a contract for the construction, repair, remodeling, or demolition of a public improvement, or obligating funds pursuant to such a contract, shall ensure that neither the awarding public agency nor a construction manager acting on behalf of the public agency includes in its bid specifications, project agreements, or other controlling documents any of the following:

(1)

A term that requires, prohibits, encourages, or discourages bidders, contractors, or subcontractors from entering into or adhering to agreements with a collective bargaining organization relating to the construction project or a related construction project; or

(2)

A term that discriminates against bidders, contractors, or subcontractors based on the status as a party or nonparty to, or the willingness or refusal to enter into, an agreement with a collective bargaining organization relating to the construction project or a related construction project.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 600, § [1].

22-9-805. Grants, tax abatements, and tax credits — Prohibited terms.

A public agency shall not award a grant, tax abatement, or tax credit that is conditioned upon a requirement that the awardee include a term described in §22-9-804 in a contract document for construction, improvement, maintenance, or renovation of real property or fixtures that are the subject of the grant, tax abatement, or tax credit.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 600, § [1].

22-9-806. Construction document preparation — Prohibited terms.

(a)

A public agency or a construction manager or other contracting entity acting on behalf of a public agency shall not place a term described in §22-9-804 in bid specifications, project agreements, or other controlling documents relating to the construction, repair, remodeling, or demolition of a public improvement.

(b)

A term included in a contract in violation of subsection (a) of this section is void.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 600, § [1].

22-9-807. Exceptions — Special circumstances.

(a)

The head of a public agency may exempt a particular project, contract, subcontract, grant, tax abatement, or tax credit from the requirements of §22-9-804 if the public agency finds, after public notice and hearing, that special circumstances require an exemption to avert an imminent threat to public health or safety.

(b)

A finding of special circumstances under this section shall not be based on the possibility or presence of a labor dispute concerning:

(1)

The use of contractors or subcontractors who are nonsignatories to, or otherwise do not adhere to, agreements with one (1) or more collective bargaining organizations; or

(2)

Employees on the project who are not members of or affiliated with a collective bargaining organization.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 600, § [1].

22-9-808. Applicability.

(a)

This subchapter does not apply to public construction contracts executed before July 22, 2015.

(b)

This subchapter does not:

(1)

Prohibit an employer or other party from entering into an agreement or engaging in another activity protected by the National Labor Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. §§ 151 — 169;

(2)

Interfere with labor relations of parties that are left unregulated under the National Labor Relations Act, 29 U.S.C. §§ 151 — 169; or

(3)

Prohibit a public agency from awarding a public contract, grant, tax abatement, or tax credit to a private owner, bidder, contractor, or subcontractor who enters into or who is a party to an agreement with a collective bargaining organization if:

(A)

Being or becoming a party or adhering to an agreement with a collective bargaining organization is not a condition for the award of the public contract, grant, tax abatement, or tax credit; and

(B)

The public agency does not discriminate against a private owner, bidder, contractor, or subcontractor in the awarding of the public contract, grant, tax abatement, or tax credit based on the status of the private owner, bidder, contractor, or subcontractor as being or becoming, or the willingness or refusal of the private owner, bidder, contractor, or subcontractor to become, a party to an agreement with a collective bargaining organization.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 600, § [1].

Subchapter 9

— Fair Notice and Efficiency in Public Works Act

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2019, No. 1075, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

There is a need for a statewide system for the online advertisement of notices of an intention to receive bids by local governmental units;

“(2)

Legislation is necessary to provide for the efficient procurement of services to provide for the online advertisement of notices of an intention to receive bids by local governmental units;

“(3)

There is a need for an impartial selection process in selecting statewide vendors to administer online advertisements of notices of an intention to receive bids by local governmental units; and

“(4)

The Office of State Procurement has the authority and infrastructure to issue requests for qualifications to effectuate this act”.

22-9-901. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Fair Notice and Efficiency in Public Works Act”.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1075, § 2.

22-9-902. Legislative intent.

The General Assembly intends for this subchapter to:

(1)

Provide for the efficient procurement of services to provide for the online advertisement of notices of an intention to receive bids by local governmental units;

(2)

Promote the economical and efficient administration and completion of public works construction projects;

(3)

Provide for an impartial selection process in selecting statewide vendors to administer online advertisements of notices of an intention to receive bids by local governmental units;

(4)

Provide for fair and open competition in selecting vendors to accomplish the goals of this subchapter;

(5)

Prohibit anticompetitive conduct in vendors, including without limitation a vendor's having a direct interest in one (1) or more of the other vendors awarded a contract under this subchapter; and

(6)

Provide significant penalties for an individual or entity that violates this subchapter.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1075, § 2.

22-9-903. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Public agency” means:

(A)

A county, city, town, and school district in this state; and

(B)

A department, agency, board, bureau, commission, committee, or authority of a county, city, town, or school district; and

(2)

“Vendor” means an individual, association, corporation, company, firm, organization, partnership, governmental entity, or any other entity that can provide an online system for the online advertisement of notice of an intention to receive bids under §§22-9-203 and22-9-209.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1075, § 2.

22-9-904. Public Works Committee — Creation — Duties — Immunity.

(a)(1)

The Public Works Committee is created and, except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, shall have the following members:

(A)

The State Procurement Director or his or her designee;

(B)

The Executive Director of the Arkansas Press Association, Inc. or his or her designee;

(C)

The Executive Director of the Association of Arkansas Counties or his or her designee;

(D)

The President of the Arkansas Municipal League or his or her designee; and

(E)

The Executive Director of the Arkansas Association of Educational Administrators or his or her designee.

(2)

If a member of the committee elects not to participate:

(A)

The Governor shall appoint a replacement; and

(B)

The member who elects not to participate is not part of the committee.

(b)

The committee shall meet as needed but at least one (1) time each year.

(c)

The committee shall:

(1)

Administer this subchapter;

(2)

Prepare an annual report on the performance of the vendors selected under this subchapter and submit the report to the Office of State Procurement;

(3)

Hear any complaints from interested individuals or entities relating to vendors selected under this subchapter;

(4)

Prepare an annual report concerning the success of this subchapter and submit the report to the Office of State Procurement; and

(5)

Perform an annual review and remove any noncompliant vendors under §22-9-907.

(d)

A majority vote of the members of the committee is required for the committee to take action.

(e)(1)

The committee has the same immunity granted to state agencies under the Arkansas Constitution.

(2)

The individual members of the committee are immune to the same extent as state employees under §19-10-305.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1075, § 2.

22-9-905. Online notice for bids.

A public agency may contract with a vendor selected under this subchapter to provide online advertisements of notices of an intention to receive bids under §§22-9-203 and22-9-209.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1075, § 2.

22-9-906. Selection of vendors.

(a)(1)

The Office of State Procurement shall select three (3) vendors using the procedures for the procurement of professional services under §19-11-801 et seq.

(2)

The office may use the responses from a previous request for qualifications under this subchapter for up to five (5) years to replace any vendors that are removed under this subchapter.

(3)

If fewer than three (3) vendors respond to the request for qualifications or if there are fewer than three (3) qualified vendors, the office shall select as many qualified vendors as possible.

(b)

The vendors selected under this subchapter shall be the only vendors with which a public agency may contract for the online advertisement of notices of an intention to receive bids under §§22-9-203 and22-9-209.

(c)

A vendor selected under this subchapter shall:

(1)

Maintain on its website a clearly designated area for public notices that is accessible through a prominently displayed and clearly labeled link from the homepage of the website; and

(2)

Primarily publish in the English language.

(d)

A vendor selected under this subchapter shall not:

(1)

Have a common owner, shareholder, member of a board of directors, employee, or any other similar interest with another vendor selected under this subchapter;

(2)(A)

Require payment or a subscription to view an advertisement of a notice of an intention to receive bids or any other posting authorized in this section.

(B)

A vendor may require payment or a subscription to view any other document; or

(3)

Provide services under this subchapter for a public agency until the public agency has complied with subsections (e) and (f) of this section.

(e)

Before using the online advertisement of notices of an intention to receive bids as a form of notification, a county, city, or town shall:

(1)

Provide notice through publication in a newspaper concurrently with notification through an online advertisement of notice of an intention to receive bids under this subchapter for five (5) weeks;

(2)

Adopt a resolution at the beginning of each calendar year that identifies each website designated by ordinance for the online posting of advertisements for notices of an intention to receive bids;

(3)

Publish notice in a newspaper of general circulation within the county identifying each website designated for the online posting of advertisements for notices of an intention to receive bids; and

(4)

Adopt an ordinance that identifies each website designated for the online posting of advertisements for notices of an intention to receive bids.

(f)

Before using the online advertisement of bids as a form of notification, a school district shall:

(1)

Provide notice through publication in a newspaper concurrently with notification through an online advertisement of notices of an intention to receive bids under this subchapter for five (5) weeks;

(2)

Adopt a resolution at the beginning of each calendar year that identifies each website designated for the online posting of advertisements for notices of an intention to receive bids; and

(3)

Publish notice in a newspaper of general circulation within the county in which the school district is located that identifies each website designated for the online posting of advertisements for notices of an intention to receive bids.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1075, § 2.

22-9-907. Annual review — Removal of vendor — Penalties.

(a)

The Public Works Committee shall review the performance and compliance of vendors selected under this subchapter.

(b)

After reasonable notice to the vendor and a reasonable opportunity for the vendor to have a hearing, the committee may remove a vendor's authority to perform the services provided for under this subchapter if the committee determines that the vendor's performance does not meet the goals of this subchapter.

(c)(1)

A vendor who knowingly violates this subchapter:

(A)

Upon conviction is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor;

(B)

Is prohibited from performing services under this subchapter or being selected as a vendor under this subchapter for five (5) years; and

(C)

Shall pay damages to any public agency, person, or entity that is found to have ascertainable damages as a result of the vendor's violation of this subchapter.

(2)

The Office of State Procurement shall maintain a list of vendors that are prohibited from performing services.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1075, § 2.

22-9-908. Replacement of vendor.

(a)

A vendor shall be replaced as soon as practicable using the procedure established under §22-9-906 if the vendor:

(1)

Is unable to perform the services required under this subchapter;

(2)

Has its authority to perform the services provided for under this subchapter removed under §22-9-907; or

(3)

Is otherwise no longer performing the services required under this subchapter.

(b)

If only one (1) vendor remains as a selected vendor under this subchapter as the result of action taken under §22-9-907, the Public Works Committee shall meet and select at least one (1) additional vendor within ninety (90) days.

(c)

An online posting to advertise the notice of an intention to receive bids by a public agency on a vendor's website at the time of a vendor's removal under §22-9-907 shall be reposted on the website of another vendor selected under this subchapter under the same terms as the original online advertisement for notice of an intention to receive bids.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1075, § 2.

22-9-909. Multiyear contracts.

A contract with a vendor under this subchapter is subject to the restrictions of §19-11-238.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1075, § 2.